src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages 
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament 
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no 
! 
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify 
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by 
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or 
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License 
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is 
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt. 
! 
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact 
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no 
 
 
! ==================================== 
!! # Sublexica for nominal morphology 
! ==================================== 
 
!! Note: Triggers **must** be put in this order ("|" meaning "or") in 
!! order for the morphophonology to work: 
 
!! {SV,ÁE,ÁI}  {EA,EX,SC}  {FCD,FVD} {WG,CSH} CLEN  {VHIGH,VBACK}  {RVSH,RLEN} {SLEN,SVSH}  SVLOW 
 
 
!! ## Table of content for this file 
!! Inflection lexica
!! 1. Unclassified lexica 
!! 2. Even-syllable stems 
!!     2.1. Two-syllabic 
!!     2.2. Four-syllabic even stems 
!! 3. Odd-syllabic stems 
!! 4. Contract stems 
!! Derivation lexica 
 
!! # Inflection lexica 
 
!! Lexicons starting with 2 are bisyllabic words, 
!! with 3 are trisyllabic, with 4 are quadrosyllabic. 
!! The contract ones start with **C** or **S**. 
!! Lexicons starting with **X** are pointed to from stem files 
!! *nouns.lexc, adjective.lexc, propernouns.lexc*, hence the **X_** (all parts of speech)
!! The lexica referred to as *basic lexica* are the ones found in the 
!! stems/nouns.lexc file. 
 
 
 
!! ## Unclassified lexica 
 
!! These two lexica are temporary lexica for words waiting to be classified. 
 
LEXICON KOLME 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** contains some ad hoc three syllable stem, for now directed to: 
3LITTER ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 
LEXICON nounstems !!≈ **@CODE@** contains words that should be classified, for now directed to: 
3LITTER ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 
 
 
!! ## Two-syllable (even) stem lexica 
 
!! ### The 2ALGA lexicon family 
!! This is the basic even-syllable lexicon. 
!! (Note: 2VADDU differs from 2ALGA in having CLEN for Sg+Com and Pl+Ill , rlen svlow, ess:-) 

 
LEXICON 2ALGA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (basic lexicon) 
 2ALGA_SG ; 
 2ALGA_PL ; 

LEXICON 2ALGA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** (Px paradigms) 
                   2ALGA_SG_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIIVE ;    ! since 2AIRU is different 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGA_SG_DIM ; ! kaandâš nieidâš kuuđhâš 

LEXICON 2ALGA_PL
                   2PUUVSAH_PL2_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIVE  ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2ALGA_PL_DIM ;
 
LEXICON 2ALGA_SG_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIIVE 
+N: X_ALGA_SG  ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; !áimupoccee 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ; ! kusâkuobâr 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff12 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ; ! sg normal suff, not COM ;  ! 
+N+Ess:%>n CPXsuff ; ! algân 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; ! algâlâš 
 
LEXICON X_ALGA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (common to all POS) 
X_ALGA_SG ; 
X_ALGA_PL ; ! 
 
LEXICON X_ALGA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** case paradigms sg a^RVlgâ, ku^RVssâ 
+Sg+Nom: K;           ! sollâ 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;           ! aalgâ 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;           ! aalgâ 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;       ! aalgân puuksân k4s removed CSH 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;       ! aalgâst 
+Sg+Com:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in K ; ! algáin, kussáin 
+Sg+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ttáá K ;     ! algâttáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;                   ! algân 
+Par:%>d K ;                   ! algâd 
 
LEXICON X_ALGA_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** case para pl (plurals for 2KUMPPI) 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;                ! kuumpih, kaandah 
+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:^WG^RLEN%>i6h K ;    ! i6 a hack to get err kaandâh (i6 always 0) 
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i K ;               ! kuumpij 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG^RVSH%>i K ;        ! kumpij 
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^RLEN%>id CPXsuff ;  ! aaššijd 
+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:^RLEN%>id CPXsuff ;  ! aaššijd 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;              ! kuumpijd 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>id K ;        ! kumppijd 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;              ! kuumpijn 
+Pl+Com:^WG^RVSH%>i GUIN ;            ! Kumpijguin 
+Pl+Abe:^WG^RVSH%>ittáá K ;           ! kumpijttáá 
 
LEXICON X_ALGA_PL_COMMON !!≈ * **@CODE@** Pl Nom and directing to 
X_WG_RLEN_PL_Loc ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>h K ;                  ! puuvsah 
 

 
LEXICON 2AIRU  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (subtype of 2ALGA) 
2ALGA_SG_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIIVE ; ! same paradigm as algâ 
2PUUVSAH_PL2_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIVE  ; 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2AIRU_DIM ; ! own dim with Gen -uu 

 
!! ### 2PUUVSAH lexicon family, stem is pu^RVk4s^RCâ 
!! This for plural only nouns. Note: Sg forms in compounds 
LEXICON 2PUUVSAH_PL   !!≈ * **@CODE@** (basic lexicon) 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG%> Rhash ;  !! has WG compound form, then pointing to 
2PUUVSAH_PL2 ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
 
LEXICON 2PUUVSAH_PL2  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (pointed to by 2KUMPPI) 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin:^CLEN 2ALGA_PL_DIM ; !kaandâš nieidâš kuuđhâš puvssiih 
2PUUVSAH_PL2_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIVE ;

LEXICON 2PUUVSAH_PL2_WITHOUT_DIMINUTIVE
+N: X_ALGA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; ! 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ; ! puvsâidân 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;                 ! viljâinis 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
+N:^WG Gen_DER ; 
 
LEXICON X_WG_RLEN_PL_Loc !!≈ * **@CODE@** plural forms with ^WG and ^^WG^RLEN 
+Pl+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>in K ;                 ! puuvsâin 
X_WG_RLEN_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_WG_RLEN_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Gen:^WG^RLEN%>i K ;              ! puuvsâi 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:^WG%>i K ;            ! puvsâi 
+Pl+Acc:^WG^RLEN%>id K ;             ! puuvsâid 
+Pl+Com:^WG%>i GUIN ;                ! puvsâiguin 
+Pl+Abe:^WG%>ittáá K ;               ! puvsâittáá 
 
!! ### 2SOLLA lexicon family 
!! SM1, RLEN, earlier LLEN !rlen svlow, sgcom/plill:rlen  ess:clen 
!! Last vowel is â. 
LEXICON 2SOLLA  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (basic lexicon) 
 2SOLLA_SG ; 
 2SOLLA_PL ; 
 
LEXICON 2SOLLA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** (Sg forms‚ pointing to Px) 
+N:   X_SOLLA_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; !áimupoccee 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^WG^RLEN%> Rhash ; ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff12nom ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Nom: VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen: VPXsuff1 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff2 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc: VPXsuff1 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff2 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN VPXsuff3 ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:s CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:^WG%>st CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Ess:n CPXsuff ;                                ! sollân 
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2JUUHA_SG_DIM ; !kaandâš nieidâš tuulâš 
+N:^WG%> Gen_DER ; 
+N:%> Nom_DER ; 
 
LEXICON 2SOLLA_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (Pl forms, pointing to Px) 
+N: X_SOLLA_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom: Rhash ; ! 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; ! 
+N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:^WG%>id CPXsuff ;              ! sooláid 
+N+Pl+Loc:^WG%>in CPXsuff ;              ! soolâin 
+N+Pl+Com:^WG%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  
+N+Der1+Der/Dimin: 2JUUHA_PL_DIM ;       ! kaandâš nieidâš tuulâš 

LEXICON X_SOLLA_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** (Sg absolute forms) 
+Sg+Nom: K;                              ! sollâ 
+Sg+Gen:^WG^RLEN K ;                     ! soolâ 
+Sg+Acc:^WG^RLEN K ;                     ! soolâ 
+Sg+Ill:^CSH^RLEN%>n K ;                 ! soolân 
+Sg+Loc:^WG^RLEN%>st K ;                 ! soolâst 
+Sg+Abe:^WG%>ttáá K ;                    ! solâttáá 
+Sg+Com:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;           ! sooláin 
+Ess:^CLEN%>n K ;                        ! sollân 
+Par:^CLEN%>d K ;                        ! sollâd 
 
LEXICON X_SOLLA_PL  !!≈ * **@CODE@** (Pl Ill, the rest pointing to 
 X_ALGA_PL_COMMON ; !!≈ @CODE@) 
+Pl+Ill:^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id K ; ! sooláid 
 
 
 
!! ### 2JUUHA lexicon family 
 
