src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
čäciravgâ+Sem/Ani-bird:čäci#ra^RVvgâ 2ALGA "" ;
liškekonnâ+Sem/Dummytag:liške#ko^RVnnâ 2SOLLA "" ;
álgusáigu+Sem/Dummytag:álgu#sá^RVi4gu 2AIRU "" ;
jyelgivárvu+Sem/Dummytag:jyelgi#vá^RVrvu 2AIRU "" ;
suormâhât+Sem/Dummytag:suormâhât nounstems "" ;
pelisuormâhât+Sem/Dummytag:pelisuormâhât nounstems "" ;
topsáhât+Sem/Dummytag:topsáhât nounstems "" ;
späilihât+Sem/Dummytag:späilihât nounstems "" ;
čiermihât+Sem/Dummytag:čiermihât nounstems "" ;
luámuruttâ+Sem/Dummytag:luámu#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA "lomaraha" ;
uáppuruttâ+Sem/Dummytag:uáppu#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA "opintoraha" ;
raddevuovdâ+Sem/Dummytag:radde#vuovdâ 2ALGA "rintakehä" ;
herttâskálžu+Sem/Dummytag:herttâ#ská^RVlžu 2AIRU "hernesimpukka" ;
fášku+Sem/Dummytag:fá^RVšku 2AIRU "lätkä" ;
spaavah+Sem/Dummytag:spaava 2PUUVSAH_PL "kantosatula" ;
viäsulovnâ+Sem/Dummytag:viäsu#lo^RVvnâ 2ALGA "asuntolaina" ;
máldu+Sem/Dummytag:má^RVldu 2AIRU "meltorauta" ;
riijvih+Sem/Dummytag:riijvih KOLME "tilke" ;
pänikorrâ+Sem/Dummytag:päni#ko^RVrrâ 2SOLLA "hammaskiille" ;
tiälkkutavdâ+Sem/State-sick:tiälkku#ta^RVvdâ 2ALGA "pilkkukuume" ;
korkkâ+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVrkk4â 2ALGA "korkki" ;
ruškisčiđđâ+Sem/Dummytag:ruškis#či^RVđđâ 2SOLLA "ruskohiili" ;
čuágán+Sem/Dummytag:čuágán KOLME "poimuri" ;
puálumuvrâ+Sem/Dummytag:puálu#mu^RVvrâ 2ALGA "palomuuri" ;
nuáidikonstâ+Sem/Dummytag:nuái4di#ko^RVnstâ 2ALGA "noitakonsti" ;
jyelgičimmâ+Sem/Dummytag:jyelgi#či^RVmmâ 2SOLLA "jalkaholvi" ;
šermâ+Sem/Dummytag:še^RVrmâ 2ALGA "kaihdin" ;
kaasupuáldán+Sem/Dummytag:kaasu#puáldán KOLME "kaasupoltin" ;
purrâmâšválju+Sem/Dummytag:purrâmâš#vá^RVlju 2AIRU "ruokavalio" ;
kuobârsáigu+Sem/Dummytag:kuobâr#sá^RVi4gu 2AIRU "sienirihmasto" ;
stuorrânjaman+Sem/Ani:stuorrâ#njaman KOLME "hevosjuotikas" ;
koloruttâ+Sem/Dummytag:kolo#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA "kulukorvaus" ;
kietâruuđah+Sem/Dummytag:kietâ#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA_PL "käteisvarat" ;
álgu+Sem/Dummytag:á^RVlgu 2AIRU "alkeet" ;
leeŋgih+Sem/Dummytag:leeŋgi 2PUUVSAH_PL "länget" ;
mánusiih+Sem/Dummytag:mánusii 2PUUVSAH_PL "kuukautiset" ;
váálduh+Sem/Dummytag:vááldu 2PUUVSAH_PL "ostokset" ;
räigipoostah+Sem/Dummytag:räigi#po^RVstâ 2PUUVSAH_PL "reikäpihdit" ;
ruvâšjáávuh+Sem/Dummytag:ruvâš#jáávu 2PUUVSAH_PL "ruisjauhot" ;
riláh+Sem/Dummytag:rilá 2PUUVSAH_PL "kottikärryt" ;
viermilostâsieđgâ+Sem/Dummytag:viermi#lostâ#sieđgâ 2ALGA "verkkolehtipaju" ;
hurstâ+Sem/Dummytag:hu^RVrstâ 2ALGA ;
čillâ+Sem/Dummytag:či^RVllâ 2SOLLA ;
lummoruuđah+Sem/Dummytag:lummo#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA_PL ;
pajalistruuđah+Sem/Dummytag:pajalist#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA_PL ;
čánásiih+Sem/Dummytag:čánásii 2PUUVSAH_PL ;
oovtâš+Sem/Dummytag:oovtâš nounstems ;
orrooruuđah+Sem/Dummytag:orroo#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA_PL ;
farmarpuuvsah+Sem/Clth:farmar#pu^RVk4s^RCâ 2PUUVSAH_PL "housut" ;
išeruttâ+Sem/Money:iše#ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA "apuraha" ; ! tags_via_apertium
juovlâáptu+Sem/Time:juovlâ#á^RVptu 2AIRU "jouluaatto" ; ! tags_via_apertium
kamâspuuvsah+Sem/Clth:kamâs#pu^RVk4s^RCâ 2PUUVSAH_PL ;
kutkâ+Sem/Ani-insect:ku^RVtk4â 2ALGA "muurahainen" ; !¢kuđháin, kuuđhâst, kuutkân, kuuđhâ tags_via_apertium
lonnjâ+Sem/Buildpart:lo^RVnnjâ 2SOLLA "huone" ;	!¢loonjáin, loonjâst, loonjân, loonjâ tags_via_apertium
nisujáávuh+Sem/Food:nisu#jáávu 2PUUVSAH_PL "vehnäjauhot" ; ! tags_via_apertium
poovtâš+Sem/Ani-bird:poovtâš nounstems "lunni" ; ! ML: cheating a little but it works tags_via_apertium
päkkinjunnjuhčâ+Sem/Ani-bird:päkki#njun#nju^RVhč^RCâ 2ALGA "" ;
riddopáinu+Sem/Plant:riddo#pá^RVi4nu 2AIRU "" ;
ruttâ+Sem/Money:ru^RVtt4â 2SOLLA "raha" ;	!YAML ¢ruuđáin, ruuđâst, ruutân, ruuđâ tags_via_apertium
sáttán+Sem/Hum:sáttán KOLME "saatana" ;  ! tags_via_apertium
topsenjunčuoškâ+Sem/Ani-insect:topsenjun#čuoškâ 2ALGA "surviaissääski" ;
tuodârárhu+Sem/Plant:tuodâr#á^RVrhu 2AIRU "tunturiarho" ;
uccpuvssiih+Sem/Clth:ucc#puvssii 2PUUVSAH_PL "alushousut" ; ! tags_via_apertium
uccâjeggijuŋŋâ+Sem/Plant:uccâ#jeggi#ju^RVŋŋâ 2SOLLA "pikkukarpalo" ;
ármu+Sem/Feat-psych:á^RVrmu 2AIRU "armo" ; !¢ármoin, áármust, áármun, áármu tags_via_apertium
šoorcih+Sem/Clth:šoorci 2PUUVSAH_PL "shortsit" ;
